Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB643.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102-C.6(b)(6) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.674, No.56), is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 1102-C.6. Transfer of Tax.--* * *(b) The amount transferred under subsection (a) shall be equal to the following:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021 (6) For the fiscal year beginning [July 1, 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter,] after June 30, 2027, and ending prior to July 1, 2028, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).(7) For the fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2028, and each fiscal year thereafter, one hundred ten million dollars ($110,000,000).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0643PN0619 - 2 - 12345678